test/src/gt-desc-yamls/proper-odd_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable propers belonging to LONDON-plc, PLACE-DIM-plc, DUORTNUS-plc, ANAR-mal, GUOLBBA-plc, ADJAGAT-plc, EATNAMAT-plc

Tests:
  Proper - Siglufjörđur: # LONDON-plc
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Siglufjörđur
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Siglufjörđura, Siglufjörđur]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Siglufjörđurii
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: Siglufjörđuris
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: siglufjörđurlažžii
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: siglufjörđurlaččaid

  Proper - Silbabološ: # PLACE-DIM-plc
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Silbabološ
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Silbaboloža
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Silbaboložii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: Silbaboložis
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: silbaboložlažžii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: silbaboložlaččaid


  Proper - Vállášvuomus: # DUORTNUS-plc
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Vállášvuomus
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Vállášvupmosa
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Vállášvupmosii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: Vállášvupmosis
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: vállášvuomuslažžii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: vállášvuomuslaččaid

  Proper - Ánddir: # ANAR-mal
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Ánddir
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Ánddira
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Ánddirii
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: Ánddiris

  Proper - Kruvnnasavu: # GUOLBBA-plc
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Kruvnnasavu
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Kruvnnasavvona
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kruvnnasavvonii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sg+Loc: Kruvnnasavvonis
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: kruvnnasavulažžii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: kruvnnasavulaččaid

  Proper - Njárgalássát: # ADJAGAT-plc
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Skoahppaádjagat
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Skoahppaádjagiid
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Skoahppaádjagiidda
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Skoahppaádjagiin
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: skoahppaájalažžii
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: skoahppaájalaččaid

  Proper - Dálvasnjaŋgguhat: # EATNAMAT-plc
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Pl+Nom: Dálvasnjaŋgguhat
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiid
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiidda
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Pl+Loc: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiin
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: dálvasnjaŋggutlažžii
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: dálvasnjaŋggutlaččaid
